Wisconsin, session 2025, SB543.
do enact as follows:SB543,11Section 1. 458.01 (13) of the statutes is amended to read:SB543,2,42458.01 (13) “Residential appraiser” means an individual who conducts 3appraisals of residential real estate or of commercial real estate having a 4transaction value of not more than $250,000 $500,000.SB543,25Section 2. 458.06 (4m) (title) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to 6read:SB543,2,77458.06 (4m) (title) Certification through reciprocity.SB543,38Section 3. 458.06 (4m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB543,2,129458.06 (4m) (b) The applicant meets the requirements established in a 10reciprocal reciprocity agreement under s. 458.12 between the department and the 11regulatory authority in the state or territory where the applicant holds the 12certificate.SB543,413Section 4. 458.08 (2) (a) of the statutes is repealed.SB543,514Section 5. 458.08 (4) (title) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:SB543,2,1515458.08 (4) (title) Licensure through reciprocity.SB543,616Section 6. 458.08 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB543,3,217458.08 (4) (b) The applicant meets the requirements established in a 18reciprocal reciprocity agreement under s. 458.12 between the department and the 1regulatory authority in the state or territory where the applicant holds the 2certificate.SB543,73Section 7. 458.08 (5) of the statutes is repealed.SB543,84Section 8. 458.09 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB543,3,75458.09 (2) (intro.) If an applicant for a certificate under s. 458.06 (3) or (4) or 6458.08 (3) or (5) (a) or for renewal of that certificate under s. 458.11 is an assessor, 7all of the following apply:SB543,98Section 9. 458.10 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB543,3,139458.10 (1) The department shall conduct examinations for general appraiser 10certification, residential appraiser certification and appraiser licensure at least 11semiannually at times and places determined by the department. The department 12shall provide public notice of each examination at least 60 days before the date of 13the examination.SB543,1014Section 10. 458.12 of the statutes is amended to read:SB543,3,1915458.12 Reciprocal Reciprocity agreements. The department may enter 16into reciprocal reciprocity agreements with officials of other states or territories of 17the United States for certifying and licensing appraisers and issue certificates to 18applicants who hold certificates in those states or territories according to the terms 19of the reciprocal reciprocity agreements.SB543,1120Section 11. 458.16 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB543,4,521458.16 (1) Each certified appraiser shall place his or her title, as described in 22s. 458.055, and certificate number on each appraisal report and each written 23appraisal agreement used by the certified appraiser in conducting appraisal 24activities. The title and certificate number shall be placed in a manner specified by 1the department in the rules promulgated under s. 458.03 (1) (f). The title 2“Wisconsin certified residential appraiser” or “WI certified residential appraiser” 3may be used only on an appraisal report or written appraisal agreement pertaining 4to commercial real estate having a transaction value of not more than $250,000 5$500,000 or to residential real estate.SB543,126Section 12. 458.34 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB543,4,107458.34 (1) (b) A federally regulated appraisal management company, 8including an appraisal management company that is a subsidiary owned and 9controlled by a financial institution regulated by a federal financial institution 10regulatory agency.SB543,1311Section 13. 458.43 (1) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB543,4,1612458.43 (1) (intro.) Except within the first 60 days after a licensed appraisal 13management company adds an independent appraiser to the licensed appraisal 14management company’s appraiser panel, a A licensed appraisal management 15company may not remove an independent appraiser from its appraiser panel unless 16the licensed appraisal management company does the following:SB543,4,1717